Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.070

Park and recreation fund.

In counties in which county park and recreation boards are formed, a county park and recreation fund shall be established. Into this fund shall be placed the allocation as the board of county commissioners annually appropriates thereto, together with miscellaneous revenues derived from the operation of parks, playgrounds, and other recreational facilities, as well as grants, gifts, and bequests for park or recreational purposes. All expenditures shall be disbursed from this fund by the county park and recreation board, and all balances remaining in this fund at the end of any year shall be carried over in such fund to the succeeding year.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.68.070. Prior: 1949 c 94 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3991-20.]